fr: Format compatible avec les berceaux: Berceau; Mini; Couffin; Ovale; Parc / parc-lit; Rond; Standard / taille normale; Tout-petit; Lit parapluie; Universel; Autre
sk-SK: Kompatibilný formát detskej postieľky: Kolíska; Mini; Mojžišov kôš; Oválna; Ohrádka/cestovná postieľka; Okrúhla; Štandardná/plná veľkosť; Pre batoľatá; Cestovná postieľka; Univerzálna; Iné
hr-HR: Kompatibilni format dječjeg krevetića: Kolijevka; Mini; Mojsijeva košara; Ovalno; Vrtić za djecu / Pack "n" Play; Okruglo; Standardno / puna veličina; Za malu djecu; Putni krevetić; Univerzalno; Ostalo
da: Kompatibel krybbeformat: Vugge; Mini; Moseskurv; Oval; Kravlegård / Pack "n" Play; Rund; Standard/fuld størrelse; Tumling; Weekendseng; Universal; Andet
de: Kompatibles Krippenformat: Stubenwagen; Mini; Moseskorb; Oval; Laufgitter/Reisebett; Rund; Standard/Normalgröße; Kleinkind; Reisebett; Universal; Sonstige
vi: Định dạng cũi em bé tương thích: Nôi; Mini; Giỏ mây sơ sinh; Hình bầu dục; Cũi chơi/Pack "n" Play; Tròn; Tiêu chuẩn/kích thước đầy đủ; Trẻ mới biết đi; Cũi du lịch; Đa năng; Khác
sv: Kompatibelt spjälsängsformat: Babykorg; Mini; Moseskorg; Oval; Resesäng/lekbox; Rund; Standard/fullstor; Småbarn; Resesäng; Universellt; Annat
bg-BG: Съвместим формат на бебешкото легло: Кошче; Мини; Моисеев кош; Овална; Кошара за игра / Pack „n“ Play; Кръгла; Стандартна/пълен размер; За прохождащо дете; Кошара за пътуване; Универсална; Друго
el: Συμβατή μορφή κούνιας: Καλαθούνα; Μίνι; Καλαθούνα (Moses); Οβάλ; Πάρκο μωρού/Pack "n" Play; Στρογγυλό; Τυπικό/κανονικού μεγέθους; Για νήπια; Κούνια ταξιδιού; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Formato de berço compatível: Moisés; Mini; Cesto moisés; Oval; Cercado/Pack “n” Play; Redondo; Padrão/tamanho normal; Infantil; Berço de viagem; Universal; Outro
it: Formato del lettino compatibile: Culla; Mini; Cesta port-enfant; Ovale; Box/Lettino da viaggio; Rotondo; Standard/full-size; Lettino; Lettino da viaggio; Universale; Altro
en: Compatible crib format: Bassinet; Mini; Moses basket; Oval; Playard/Pack "n" Play; Round; Standard/full-size; Toddler; Travel crib; Universal; Other
ko: 호환 아기침대 형식: 배시넷; Mini; 모세 바스켓; 타원형; 플레이야드/Pack “n” Play; 원형; 표준/풀사이즈; 토들러; 여행용 아기침대; 범용; 기타
cs: Kompatibilní formát pro dětskou postýlku: Kolébka; Mini; Mojžíšův koš; Oválné; Hrací ohrádka / Pack „n“ Play; Kulaté; Standardní / plná velikost; Pro batolata; Cestovní postýlka; Univerzální; Jiné
ja: 対応クリブフォーマット: バシネット; ミニ; クーファン; オーバル; プレイヤード / Pack "n" Play; ラウンド; 標準 / フルサイズ; トドラー; トラベルクリブ; 汎用; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva kehdon muoto: Kehto; Pieni; Mooseskori; Ovaali; Leikkikehä / Pack ”n” Play; Pyöreä; Vakio/täysikokoinen; Taapero; Matkasänky; Universaali; Muu
ru: Совместимый формат кроватки: Колыбель; Мини; Корзина Моисея; Овальная; Манеж / Pack "n" Play; Круглая; Стандартная/полноразмерная; Для тоддлеров; Дорожная кроватка; Универсальный; Другое
nb: Kompatibel krybbeformat: Babykurv; Mini; Moseskurv; Oval; Lekegrind / Pack «n» Play; Rund; Standard/full størrelse; Småbarn; Reiseseng; Universell; Annet
pt-PT: Formato de berço compatível: Berço de recém-nascido; Berço mini; Cesto de Moisés; Oval; Parque infantil/Pack "n" Play; Redondo; Padrão/tamanho normal; Criança pequena; Berço de viagem; Universal; Outro
nl: Compatibel ledikantformaat: Wieg; Mini; Mozesmand; Ovaal; Campingbedje/box; Rond; Standaardformaat; Peuter; Reisbedje; Universeel; Overig
es: Formato de cuna compatible: Moisés; Mini; Cesta moisés; Ovalado; Corral de juegos/Pack 'n' Play; Redondo; Estándar/tamaño completo; Para niños pequeños; Cuna de viaje; Universal; Otro
ro-RO: Format de pătuț compatibil: Pătuț coșuleț; Mini; Coșuleț tip Moise; Oval; Țarc de joacă/Pătuț pliant (Pack „n” Play); Rotund; Standard/dimensiune normală; Copii mici; Pătuț de voiaj; Universal; Altele
sl-SI: Združljiv format zibelke: Košek; Mini; Mojzesova košara; Ovalno; Stajica/zložljiva posteljica; Okroglo; Standardno/polna velikost; Za malčke; Prenosna posteljica; Univerzalno; Drugo
lt-LT: Suderinamo formato vaikiška lovelė: Lopšys; Mini; Pintas lopšys („Mozės“ krepšys); Ovali; Maniežas / „Pack 'n' Play“; Apvali; Standartinė / pilno dydžio; Vaikiška; Kelioninė lovytė; Universali; Kita
hu: Kompatibilis kiságy-formátum: Bölcső; Mini; Mózeskosár; Ovális; Járóka / Pack "n" Play; Kerek; Standard / teljes méretű; Kisgyermek; Utazóágy; Univerzális; Egyéb
pl: Zgodny format łóżeczka: Kołyska; Mini; Kosz Mojżesza; Owalne; Kojec / Pack „n” Play; Okrągłe; Standardowe/pełnowymiarowe; Dla starszego dziecka; Łóżeczko turystyczne; Uniwersalny; Inne
zh-TW: 相容嬰兒床規格: 搖籃; 迷你; 摩西搖籃; 橢圓形; 遊戲床/Pack "n" Play; 圓形; 標準/全尺寸; 幼童; 旅行嬰兒床; 通用; 其他
tr: Uyumlu beşik formatı: Sepet beşik; Mini; Musa sepeti; Oval; Oyun parkı / Pack "n" Play; Yuvarlak; Standart/tam boy; Küçük çocuk; Seyahat beşiği; Evrensel; Diğer
th: รูปแบบเปลเด็กที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เปลเด็กอ่อน; Mini; ตะกร้าโมเสส; วงรี; คอกกั้นเด็ก/Pack "n" Play; ทรงกลม; มาตรฐาน/ขนาดเต็ม; เด็กวัยเตาะแตะ; เปลพกพา; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适用婴儿床规格: 摇篮; 迷你; 摩西吊篮; 椭圆形; 游戏床/折叠婴儿床; 圆形; 标准/全尺寸; 幼儿床; 旅行婴儿床; 通用; 其他